Hawaii statutes.
§392-69 Request for wage and employment
information. An employer to whom the department has sent a request for
wage and employment information for an employee claiming benefits against the trust
fund for disability benefits, shall complete and file such information within
seven days from date the request was sent. If an employer fails to file such
information in seven days, the director shall levy a penalty of not more than
$10 for each delinquent request, unless the failure to file such information is
excused by the director after a showing by such employer that such filing could
not be made on the prescribed date therefor owing to conditions over which the
employer had no control. [L 1971, c 109, §1(1); gen ch 1985; am L 2013, c 100, §8]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next